Montana, session 2025, LC2054.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Human growth and development instruction -- content. (1) A school
district's health curriculum must include human growth and development instruction. The human growth and
development instruction must include:
(a) a high-definition ultrasound video that is at least 3 minutes long and that shows the
development of the brain, heart, and other vital organs in early fetal development; and
(b) a high-quality, computer-generated rendering or animation that shows the process of
fertilization and every stage of human development inside the uterus, noting significant markers in cell growth
and organ development for each significant marker of pregnancy until birth.
(2) The board of public education shall ensure the requirements of this section are included in the
Montana health content standards.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "human growth and development instruction" means an oral,
written, or digital lesson, lecture, or presentation about human biology related to pregnancy and human
development inside the womb.

Section 2. Section 20-7-120, MCA, is amended to read:
"20-7-120. Excused absences from curriculum requirements -- notice -- prohibited activities.
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC2054.1
(1) A parent, guardian, or other person who is responsible for the care of a child may refuse to allow the child to
attend or may withdraw the child from a course of instruction, a class period, an assembly, an organized school
function, or instruction provided by the district through its staff or guests invited at the request of the district
regarding human sexuality instruction. The withdrawal or refusal to attend is an excused absence pursuant to
20-5-103.
(2) Any school implementing or maintaining a curriculum, providing materials, or holding an event
or assembly at which the district provides human sexuality instruction, whether introduced by school educators,
administrators, or officials or by guests invited at the request of the school, shall adopt a policy ensuring
parental or guardian notification no less than 48 hours prior to holding an event or assembly or introducing
materials for instructional use.
(3) A school district offering human sexuality instruction shall ensure that the instruction includes:
(a) a high-definition ultrasound video that is at least 3 minutes long and that shows the
development of the brain, heart, and other vital organs in early fetal development; and
(b) a high-quality, computer-generated rendering or animation that shows the process of
fertilization and every stage of human development inside the uterus, noting significant markers in cell growth
and organ development for each significant marker of pregnancy until birth.
(3)(4) A school district shall annually notify the parent or guardian of each student scheduled to be
enrolled in human sexuality instruction in the district or school in advance of the instruction of:
(a) the basic content of the district's or school's human sexuality instruction intended to be taught
to the student; and
(b) the parent's or guardian's right to withdraw the student from the district's or school's human
sexuality instruction.
(4)(5) A school district shall make all curriculum materials used in the district's or school's human
sexuality instruction available for public inspection prior to the use of the materials in actual instruction.
(5)(6) A school district or its personnel or agents may not permit a person, entity, or any affiliate or
agent of the person or entity to offer, sponsor, or furnish in any manner any course materials or instruction
relating to human sexuality or sexually transmitted diseases to its students or personnel if the person, entity, or
any affiliate or agent of the person or entity is a provider of abortion services.
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC2054.1
(7) The board of public education shall ensure that the requirements of subsection (3) are included
in the Montana health content standards.
(6)(8) For the purposes of this section, "human sexuality instruction" means teaching or otherwise
providing information about human sexuality, including intimate relationships, human sexual anatomy, sexual
reproduction, sexually transmitted infections, sexual acts, sexual orientation, gender identity, abstinence,
contraception, or reproductive rights and responsibilities."

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an
integral part of Title 20, chapter 7, part 1, and the provisions of Title 20, chapter 7, part 1, apply to [section 1].

NEW SECTION. Section 4. Effective date. [This act] is effective July 1, 2025.
- END -
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – ****